Illinois, session 104th, HB4721.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grocery Initiative Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 15 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 750/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Cooperative" means an organization that is organized 9according to the Co-operative Act. 10    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 11Opportunity.12    "Food desert" means a census tract that:13        (1) meets one of the following poverty standards:14            (A) the census tract has a poverty rate of at least 15        20%; or16            (B) the census tract is not located within a 17        metropolitan statistical area and has a median family 18        income that is less than or equal to 80% of the 19        statewide median household income; or20            (C) the census tract is located within a 21        metropolitan statistical area and has a median family 22        income that is less than or equal to 80% of the greater 23        of (i) the statewide median household income or (ii)   HB4721- 2 -LRB104 20342 HLH 33793 b1        the metropolitan area median family income; and2        (2) meets one of the following population density and 3    food accessibility standards:4            (A) the census tract is a rural tract, and at least 5        33% of the population of the tract or at least 500 6        residents in the tract reside more than 10 miles from 7        the nearest grocery store; or8            (B) the census tract is an urban tract, and at 9        least 33% of the population of the tract or at least 10        500 residents in the tract reside more than one-half 11        mile from the nearest grocery store.12    The Department may also designate an area that does not 13meet the standards set forth in this definition as a food 14desert if the designation is made in accordance with criteria 15established by the Department by rule using data that 16includes, but is not limited to, poverty metrics and access to 17existing grocery stores.18    "Grocery store" means an existing or planned retail 19establishment that: (1) has or will have a primary business of 20selling a variety of grocery products, including fresh 21produce; (2) derives or will derive no more than 30% of its 22revenue from sales of tobacco and alcohol in any given year; 23(3) is or will be classified as a supermarket or other grocery 24retailer in the 2022 North American Industry Classification 25System under code 445110; (4) accepts or will accept 26Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits and Special   HB4721- 3 -LRB104 20342 HLH 33793 b1Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and 2Children benefits; and (5) provides or will provide for the 3retail sale of a substantial variety of perishable foods, 4including fresh or frozen dairy products, fresh produce, and 5fresh meats, poultry, and fish. 6    "Local governmental unit" means any county, municipality, 7township, special district, or unit that is designated as a 8unit of local government by law and exercises limited 9governmental powers or powers in respect to limited 10governmental subjects. "Local governmental unit" also includes 11any school district or community college district.12    "Mobile farmers market" means a farmers market operated 13from a movable motor driven or propelled vehicle or trailer 14that can change location, including a farmers market owned and 15operated by a farmer or a third party that sells products on 16behalf of farmers or cottage food operations with the intent 17of a direct sale to an end consumer. 18    "Not-for-profit corporation" means an organization or 19institution that is organized and conducted on a 20not-for-profit basis with no personal profit inuring to anyone 21as a result of the operation and that is organized according to 22the General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 1986.23    "Online farmers market" means an online marketplace that 24sells products primarily from Illinois farmers and provides 25delivery or pick-up options for consumers. 26    "Rural tract" means a census tract that is not an urban   HB4721- 4 -LRB104 20342 HLH 33793 b1tract.2    "Urban tract" means a census tract having its geographic 3centroid in an urban area, as defined by the Bureau of the 4Census for the most recent year in which all relevant data to 5identify food deserts is available.6(Source: P.A. 103-561, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    (20 ILCS 750/15)8    Sec. 15. Grocery Initiative Grants and Financial Support.9    (a) The Department shall, subject to appropriation, 10establish the Grocery Initiative to expand access to healthy 11foods in food deserts in Illinois and areas at risk of becoming 12food deserts in Illinois by providing grants and other forms 13of financial assistance to independently owned for-profit 14grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores, or not-for-profit 15grocery stores, mobile farmers markets, online farmers 16markets, as well as grocery stores owned and operated by local 17governmental units. The Department may enter into contracts, 18grants, or other agreements to administer these grants and 19other forms of financial assistance. The Department may, by 20rule, place limits on the size of the entities grocery stores 21that are eligible for grants and other financial assistance 22under this Act, including, but not limited to, limits on the 23annual revenue or projected revenue of the applicant, number 24of full-time employees, or square footage of the facilities. 25The Department may prioritize grant awards and loan funding to   HB4721- 5 -LRB104 20342 HLH 33793 b1applicants based on poverty rates, income, geographic 2diversity, local ownership, access to grocery stores in the 3area surrounding proposed project locations, and other factors 4as determined by the Department. The Department may award 5grants or provide loans for any one or more of the following:6        (1) market and site feasibility studies, promotional 7    materials, and marketing;8        (2) salaries and benefits for workers;9        (3) rent or a down payment to acquire a facility;10        (4) purchase of ownership of a grocery store as part 11    of establishing a new grocery store;12        (5) capital improvements, planning, renovations, land 13    acquisition, demolition, durable and non-durable equipment 14    purchases; or15        (6) technology upgrades, including software and 16    point-of-sale systems; or 17        (7) (6) other costs as determined eligible by the 18    Department.19    (b) The Department may, subject to appropriation, provide 20grants for equipment upgrades for existing independently owned 21for-profit grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores, 22not-for-profit grocery stores, or farmer-owned grocery stores 23or markets. The Department shall use no more than 20% of total 24program funding for this purpose. Equipment upgrades shall be 25focused on providing access to equipment that is energy 26efficient.  HB4721- 6 -LRB104 20342 HLH 33793 b1(Source: P.A. 103-561, eff. 1-1-24; 103-957, eff. 1-1-25.)